District of Columbia statutes.
38-634

Rules and regulations for implementation of subchapter.

Repealed.

Oct. 5, 1993, D.C. Law 10-55, § 5, 40 DCR 7219
Feb. 2, 2008, D.C. Law 17-107, § 14, 54 DCR 12230

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2434.

Prior Codifications

See notes to § 38-631.
For temporary (90-day) addition of §§ 31-2451 to 31-2454 1981 Ed., see §§ 2 to 5 of the Attendance and School Safety Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-319, April 17, 2000, 47 DCR 2882).

Emergency Legislation